Massachusetts, session 194th, H162.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of chapter 94G of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the words “for which it conducts a test,” the following new
words:-
except that it may have a financial interest in a marijuana establishment licensed by the
Commission to conduct research.
Subsection (a)(5) of section 15 of chapter 94G of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by inserting after the word “marijuana establishment” the following new
words:-
of 2

except that it may have a financial interest in a marijuana establishment licensed by the
Commission to conduct research
of 2